Utah statutes.
34A-6-105.   Procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.

The commission, the division, and the administrator shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in any adjudicative proceedings that they conduct under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

